Nevada, session 83, SB388.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 422A.630 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422A.630 1. To the extent authorized by federal law, the
Director shall include in the state plan established for the Program
for Child Care and Development pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 9858c:
-
*SB388*

– 2 –
(a) Measures to increase the availability of child care for
children with a disability, which may include, without limitation:
(1) An enhanced rate of reimbursement for child care
provided to a child with a disability by a provider that receives any
training or technical assistance deemed appropriate by the Director
for the care of that child;
(2) Other economic incentives for such child care; or
(3) The provision of supplemental services to child care
facilities or persons who provide child care for the purpose of
increasing access to child care for children with disabilities.
(b) A requirement that, to the extent of money available, the
Program provide reimbursement for a portion of the cost of child
care provided to the child of a parent who is:
(1) Enrolled in an educational or vocational program that
awards a degree or certificate at a postsecondary educational
institution or eligible institution; and
(2) Otherwise eligible to participate in the Program.
(c) A cost-sharing requirement for families receiving
assistance under the Program that must:
(1) Be based on a sliding fee scale of cost-sharing
requirements pursuant to which no cost sharing is required for a
family with an income in one of the four lowest income brackets
on the sliding fee scale.
(2) Not exceed 5 percent of the gross income of the family.
2. On or before April of each even-numbered year, the Director
shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and the Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
Judiciary a report which must include:
(a) A description of the measures included in the state plan
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1; and
(b) Data concerning the usage of reimbursements pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible institution” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 396.916.
(b) “Postsecondary educational institution” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 394.099.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
-
*SB388*

– 3 –
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB388*